North Carolina, session 2025, SB1058.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Charlotte Mecklenburg Library
Foundation, a nonprofit organization, for the construction of the new main library.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The C.W. Williams Community
Health Center, Inc., a nonprofit organization, to assist in the completion of its full-service
community health center located in Mecklenburg County.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of nine million five hundred thousand dollars ($9,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, to be used for the planning and design of the
Westmoreland Road Interchange (Interstate 77 Exit 27) in the Town of Cornelius.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to provide directed grants as
follows:
(1) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the Habitat for Humanity of the Charlotte
Region, Inc., a nonprofit corporation, for costs associated with providing
affordable housing in the Charlotte region.
(2) Two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) to the City of
Charlotte for operational expenses and other costs of The Umbrella Center in
Charlotte.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of six million five hundred thousand dollars ($6,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The Discovery
Place-Charlotte Nature Museum, a nonprofit organization, for capital improvements to the
museum facilities.
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S1058-v-1*